District of Columbia statutes.
36-124

Refusal to surrender to registrant a registered container prima facie evidence of unlawful use.

In any prosecution under this subchapter, the refusal of any person having possession of any registered milk bottle, can, crate, or other container to surrender possession of the same to the registrant of the name, mark, or device appearing thereon, after notice and demand by said registrant or his agent, shall be prima facie evidence of the unlawful use or traffic in the same contrary to the provisions of this subchapter.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 810, ch. 737, § 4
1981 Ed., § 48-204.
1973 Ed., § 48-204.